Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1332
Unclaimed property; sale proceeds; disposition.

The county sheriff shall pay over to the county treasurer the proceeds of any sale authorized by sections 69-1330 to 69-1332, less the reasonable expenses of such sale. The county treasurer shall hold such proceeds for a period of two years from the date of sale. If at the end of such period no person has presented a lawful claim to the proceeds of such sale, the county treasurer shall deposit such proceeds, including any interest thereon, to the general fund of the county and any claims thereon shall be extinguished.

Laws 1981, LB 280, § 3.